Utah statutes.
16-10a-1409.   Service on dissolved corporation.

(1)  A dissolved corporation shall either:

(a)  maintain a registered agent in this state to accept service of process on its behalf; or

(b)  be deemed to have authorized service of process on it by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of its principal office, if any, as set forth in its articles of dissolution or as last changed by notice delivered to the division for filing or to the address for service of process that is stated in its articles of dissolution or as last changed by notice delivered to the division for filing.

(2)  Service effected pursuant to Subsection (1)(b) is perfected at the earliest of:

(a)  the date the dissolved corporation receives the process, notice, or demand;

(b)  the date shown on the return receipt, if signed on behalf of the dissolved corporation; or

(c)  five days after mailing.

(3)  Subsection (1) does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of service on a dissolved corporation.

